Washington statutes.
RCW 10.58.038

Polygraph examinations—Victims of alleged sex offenses.

A law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, or other government official may not ask or require a victim of an alleged sex offense to submit to a polygraph examination or other truth telling device as a condition for proceeding with the investigation of the offense. The refusal of a victim to submit to a polygraph examination or other truth telling device shall not by itself prevent the investigation, charging, or prosecution of the offense. For the purposes of this section, "sex offense" is any offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW.

[ 2007 c 202 s 1.]